Utah statutes.
31A-22-510.   Requirements for group life insurance delivered in another
jurisdiction.
(1) A Utah resident may not be enrolled in a policy of group life insurance
delivered in another jurisdiction in violation of Subsection (2) or (3),
notwithstanding any contrary provision in Subsection 31A-1-103(3).
(2)  Unless specifically authorized by the commissioner under Section
31A-22-509, coverage under a group life insurance policy delivered in another
jurisdiction may not be initially provided to any person unless the policy
conforms substantially to one of the types of groups specified under Sections
31A-22-502 through 31A-22-508.
(3) Coverage may not be initially provided to any person in Utah under a group
life policy issued in another jurisdiction by an insurer not authorized to
engage in life insurance business in Utah unless the policyholder conforms
substantially to the type of group specified under Section 31A-22-502,
31A-22-503, or 31A-22-504.
